Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.131

Correction of errors in reporting compensation earnable.

(1) Notwithstanding RCW 41.50.130, the department is not required to correct, nor to cause any employer to correct the reporting error described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Standby pay and other similar forms of compensation that are not pay for time worked were not salary or wages for personal services within the meaning of RCW 41.40.010(8). Contrary to RCW 41.40.010(8), some employers have been reporting standby pay to the department as compensation earnable. To avoid unduly impacting the retirement allowances of persons who have retired on or before June 9, 1994, the department is not required to correct, nor cause to be corrected, any misreporting of amounts identified as standby pay through June 9, 1994. Any erroneous reporting of amounts identified as standby pay to the department on or after June 9, 1994, shall be corrected as an error under RCW 41.50.130.

(3) The forgiveness of past misreporting under subsection (2) of this section constitutes a benefit enhancement for those individuals for whom amounts received as standby pay were misreported to the department. Prior to June 9, 1994, no retirement system member had any right, contractual or otherwise, to have amounts identified as standby pay included as compensation earnable.

[ 1994 c 177 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—1994 c 177: See note following RCW 41.50.125.